Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 773. COORDINATION OF REGULATORY AGENCY INFORMATION GATHERING

Sec. 773.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "regulatory agency" means an agency, including a department, commission, board, or office that:

(1) is created by the constitution or by statute;

(2) is in the executive branch of state government;

(3) has statewide authority; and

(4) has authority to grant, deny, renew, suspend, or revoke a license, permit, certificate, registration, or other form of permission to engage in an occupation or to operate a business.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 773.002. PROCEDURE BEFORE GATHERING NEW INFORMATION. A regulatory agency may inspect, survey, or investigate a person regulated by the agency or require the person to file a report only if the executive head of the agency determines that the agency's need for the information concerning the person is not substantially satisfied by information previously gathered by the agency or another regulatory agency.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 773.003. DUTY TO RELEASE INFORMATION. The executive head of a regulatory agency, on request, shall release to the executive head of another regulatory agency any information about a regulated person that the agency gathers in an inspection, survey, or investigation of the person or in a report filed by the person if the information is:

(1) not made confidential by statute; and

(2) within the requesting regulatory agency's jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 773.004. COORDINATION OF INFORMATION GATHERING. The executive head of a regulatory agency shall coordinate the agency's inspections, surveys, investigations, and reporting requirements within the agency and with other regulatory agencies to avoid the duplication of those functions.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.